Utah statutes.
47-1-5.   Order of abatement -- Execution -- Sale of personal property --
Padlocking.
If the existence of the nuisance is established in an action as provided in
this chapter, an order of abatement shall be entered as a part of the judgment
in the case. The order shall direct the removal from the building or place of
all fixtures, furniture, musical instruments, and movable property used in
conducting the nuisance, and shall direct the sale thereof in the manner
provided for the sale of chattels under execution, and shall further direct
the effective closing of the building or place against its use for any
purpose, and the keeping of it so closed for a period of one year, unless
sooner released. If any person shall break and enter or use a building,
structure, or place so directed to be closed, he shall be punished as for
contempt as provided in Section 47-1-4. For removing and selling the movable
property the officer shall be entitled to charge and receive the same fees as
for levying upon and selling like property on execution; and for closing the
premises and keeping them closed a reasonable sum shall be allowed by the
court.
